Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF42.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Health. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Health for the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Suicide prevention curriculum. new text end new text begin (a) For a grant to the Division of Indian Work to develop suicide prevention curriculum: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The Division of Indian Work must use the grant award to develop and pilot culturally specific suicide prevention curriculum for Native American youth. The curriculum must engage students in topics of mental health, emotional intelligence, and depression and suicide to increase understanding of mental wellness and provide practical tools for supporting themselves and others through painful times. new text end new text begin (c) This is a onetime appropriation. new text end